Illinois, session 104th, SB2142.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Sections 3 and 3.1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/3)  (from Ch. 116, par. 203)7    Sec. 3. (a) Each public body shall make available to any 8person for inspection or copying all public records, except as 9otherwise provided in Sections 7 and 8.5 of this Act. 10Notwithstanding any other law, a public body may not grant to 11any person or entity, whether by contract, license, or 12otherwise, the exclusive right to access and disseminate any 13public record as defined in this Act.14    (b) Subject to the fee provisions of Section 6 of this Act, 15each public body shall promptly provide, to any person who 16submits a request, a copy of any public record required to be 17disclosed by subsection (a) of this Section and shall certify 18such copy if so requested.19    (c) Requests for inspection or copies shall be made in 20writing and directed to the public body. Written requests may 21be submitted to a public body via personal delivery, mail, 22telefax, or other means available to the public body. A public 23body may honor oral requests for inspection or copying. A   SB2142- 2 -LRB104 08960 BDA 19015 b1public body may not require that a request be submitted on a 2standard form or require the requester to specify the purpose 3for a request, except to determine whether the records are 4requested for a commercial purpose or whether to grant a 5request for a fee waiver. All requests for inspection and 6copying received by a public body shall immediately be 7forwarded to its Freedom of Information officer or designee. 8    (d) Each public body shall, promptly, either comply with 9or deny a request for public records within 15 5 business days 10after its receipt of the request, unless the time for response 11is properly extended under subsection (e) of this Section. 12Denial shall be in writing as provided in Section 9 of this 13Act. Failure to comply with a written request, extend the time 14for response, or deny a request within 5 business days after 15its receipt shall be considered a denial of the request. A 16public body that fails to respond to a request within the 17requisite periods in this Section but thereafter provides the 18requester with copies of the requested public records may not 19impose a fee for such copies. A public body that fails to 20respond to a request received may not treat the request as 21unduly burdensome under subsection (g). 22    (e) The time for response under this Section may be 23extended by the public body for not more than 10 5 business 24days from the original due date for any of the following 25reasons:26        (i) the requested records are stored in whole or in   SB2142- 3 -LRB104 08960 BDA 19015 b1    part at other locations than the office having charge of 2    the requested records;3        (ii) the request requires the collection of a 4    substantial number of specified records;5        (iii) the request is couched in categorical terms and 6    requires an extensive search for the records responsive to 7    it;8        (iv) the requested records have not been located in 9    the course of routine search and additional efforts are 10    being made to locate them;11        (v) the requested records require examination and 12    evaluation by personnel having the necessary competence 13    and discretion to determine if they are exempt from 14    disclosure under Section 7 of this Act or should be 15    revealed only with appropriate deletions;16        (vi) the request for records cannot be complied with 17    by the public body within the time limits prescribed by 18    subsection (d) of this Section without unduly burdening or 19    interfering with the operations of the public body;20        (vii) there is a need for consultation, which shall be 21    conducted with all practicable speed, with another public 22    body or among 2 or more components of a public body having 23    a substantial interest in the determination or in the 24    subject matter of the request.25    The person making a request and the public body may agree 26in writing to extend the time for compliance for a period to be   SB2142- 4 -LRB104 08960 BDA 19015 b1determined by the parties. If the requester and the public 2body agree to extend the period for compliance, a failure by 3the public body to comply with any previous deadlines shall 4not be treated as a denial of the request for the records. 5    (f) When additional time is required for any of the above 6reasons, the public body shall, within 15 5 business days 7after receipt of the request, notify the person making the 8request of the reasons for the extension and the date by which 9the response will be forthcoming. Failure to respond within 10the time permitted for extension shall be considered a denial 11of the request. A public body that fails to respond to a 12request within the time permitted for extension but thereafter 13provides the requester with copies of the requested public 14records may not impose a fee for those copies. A public body 15that requests an extension and subsequently fails to respond 16to the request may not treat the request as unduly burdensome 17under subsection (g).18    (g) Requests calling for all records falling within a 19category shall be complied with unless compliance with the 20request would be unduly burdensome for the complying public 21body and there is no way to narrow the request and the burden 22on the public body outweighs the public interest in the 23information. Before invoking this exemption, the public body 24shall extend to the person making the request an opportunity 25to confer with it in an attempt to reduce the request to 26manageable proportions. If any public body responds to a   SB2142- 5 -LRB104 08960 BDA 19015 b1categorical request by stating that compliance would unduly 2burden its operation and the conditions described above are 3met, it shall do so in writing, specifying the reasons why it 4would be unduly burdensome and the extent to which compliance 5will so burden the operations of the public body. Such a 6response shall be treated as a denial of the request for 7information. 8    Repeated requests from the same person for the same 9records that are unchanged or identical to records previously 10provided or properly denied under this Act shall be deemed 11unduly burdensome under this provision.12    (h) Each public body may promulgate rules and regulations 13in conformity with the provisions of this Section pertaining 14to the availability of records and procedures to be followed, 15including:16        (i) the times and places where such records will be 17    made available, and18        (ii) the persons from whom such records may be 19    obtained.20    (i) The time periods for compliance or denial of a request 21to inspect or copy records set out in this Section shall not 22apply to requests for records made for a commercial purpose, 23requests by a recurrent requester, or voluminous requests. 24Such requests shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 253.1, 3.2, and 3.6 of this Act, as applicable. 26(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19.)   SB2142- 6 -LRB104 08960 BDA 19015 b1    (5 ILCS 140/3.1)2    Sec. 3.1. Requests for commercial purposes. 3    (a) A public body shall respond to a request for records to 4be used for a commercial purpose within 30 business 21 working 5days after receipt. The response shall (i) provide to the 6requester an estimate of the time required by the public body 7to provide the records requested and an estimate of the fees to 8be charged, which the public body may require the person to pay 9in full before copying the requested documents, (ii) deny the 10request pursuant to one or more of the exemptions set out in 11this Act, (iii) notify the requester that the request is 12unduly burdensome and extend an opportunity to the requester 13to attempt to reduce the request to manageable proportions, or 14(iv) provide the records requested.15    (b) Unless the records are exempt from disclosure, a 16public body shall comply with a request within a reasonable 17period considering the size and complexity of the request, and 18giving priority to records requested for non-commercial 19purposes.20    (c) It is a violation of this Act for a person to knowingly 21obtain a public record for a commercial purpose without 22disclosing that it is for a commercial purpose, if requested 23to do so by the public body.24(Source: P.A. 96-542, eff. 1-1-10.)